California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) Subdivision (a) also applies to inspections of the accounts, books, papers, and documents of any business that is a subsidiary or affiliate of, or a corporation that holds a controlling interest in, an electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, or a water corporation that has 2,000 or more service connections, with respect to any transaction between the water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation and the subsidiary, affiliate, or holding corporation on any matter that might adversely affect the interests of the ratepayers of the water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   (SB 1364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

314.5.

(a) (1) The commission shall apply a risk-based methodology to conduct audits or reviews of the books and records of electrical, gas, telephone,
 water, and sewer corporations.

(2) The commission shall conduct a review or audit of the books and records of every electrical or gas corporation at least once every five years.

(3) The commission shall conduct an audit or review of the books and records of every high-risk telephone, water, or sewer corporation, as determined by the commission, during the regular regulatory review of those entities, at least once every 10 years.

(b) An audit or review conducted
 pursuant to Section 274 or 792.5
 shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) The commission shall post reports of reviews and audits and other pertinent information on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 23.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

314.6.

(a) The commission may conduct financial and performance reviews or audits of any entity or program created by any order, decision, motion, settlement, or other action of the commission.

(b) The commission shall complete any review or audit in a timely manner consistent with applicable auditing standards.

(c) After performing a review or audit pursuant to this section, the commission may conduct additional followup work that is related to any findings and recommendations related to the review or audit.

(d) Beginning January 15, 2020, and every year thereafter, the commission shall post on its internet website its standard practice audit
 manual, titled Utility Audit, Finance and Compliance Branch UAFCB Audit and Attestation Standard Practice, and updates to that manual, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   (AB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

315.

The commission shall investigate the cause of all accidents occurring within this State upon the property of any public utility or directly or indirectly arising from or connected with its maintenance or operation, resulting in loss of life or injury to person or property and requiring, in the judgment of the commission, investigation by it, and may make such order or recommendation with respect thereto as in its judgment seems just and reasonable. Neither the order or recommendation of the commission nor any accident report filed with the commission shall be admitted as evidence in any action for damages based on or arising out of such loss of life, or injury to person or
 property. Every public utility shall file with the commission, under such rules as the commission prescribes, a report of each accident so occurring of such kinds or classes as the commission from time to time designates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

316.

(a) Each electrical corporation shall cooperate fully with the commission in an investigation into any major accident or any reportable incident, as these terms are defined by the commission, concerning overhead electric supply facilities, regardless of pending litigation or other investigations, including, but not limited to, those that may be related to a commission investigation.

(b) After the scene of the incident has been made safe and service has been restored, each electrical corporation
 shall provide the commission, upon its request, immediate access to all of the following:

(1) Any factual or physical evidence under the electrical corporation’s, or its agent’s, physical control, custody, or possession related to the incident.

(2) The name and contact information of any known percipient witness.

(3) Any employee percipient witness under the electrical corporation’s control.

(4) The name and contact information of any person or entity that has taken possession of any physical evidence removed from the site of the incident.

(5) Any and all documents under the
 electrical corporation’s control that are related to the incident and are not subject to attorney-client privilege or attorney work product doctrine.

(c) Each electrical corporation shall preserve any and all documents or evidence it collects as part of its own investigation related to the incident for at least five years or a shorter period of time as authorized by the commission.

(d) Any and all documents collected by an electrical corporation pursuant to this section shall be catalogued and preserved in an accessible manner for assessment by commission investigators as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

317.

The commission may request the local agency formation commission to advise it as to any special districts as defined in Section 54775 of the Government Code who are authorized and capable of performing comparable utility service within an area for which a public utility is seeking certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 920.)
-------------------------------------------

320.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is the policy of this state to achieve, whenever feasible and not inconsistent with sound environmental planning, the undergrounding of all future electric and communication distribution facilities which are proposed to be erected in proximity to any highway designated a state scenic highway pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 260) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code and which would be visible from such scenic highways if erected above ground. The commission shall prepare and adopt by December 31, 1972, a statewide plan and schedule for the undergrounding of all such utility distribution facilities in
 accordance with the aforesaid policy and the rules of the commission relating to the undergrounding of facilities.

The commission shall coordinate its activities regarding the plan with local governments and planning commissions concerned.

The commission shall require compliance with the plan upon its adoption.

This section shall not apply to facilities necessary to the operation of any railroad.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

(a) The commission shall appoint a public advisor and establish an office of the public advisor, including a separate office in the Los Angeles office of the commission. The commission may employ staff as necessary to carry out the duties of the office of the public advisor. The office of the public advisor shall assist members of the public and ratepayers who desire to testify before or present information to the commission in any hearing or proceeding of the commission. The public advisor shall advise the commission on procedural matters relating to public participation in proceedings of the commission.

(b) The public advisor and executive director
 shall publicize the commission’s programs for encouraging and supporting
 participation in the commission’s proceedings.

(c) The public advisor shall receive complaints and comments from members of the public concerning how the commission is carrying out its functions. The public advisor shall maintain the confidentiality of the identity of a member of the public who makes a complaint or comment unless the member of the public expressly indicates a desire to communicate his or her identity to the commission. The public advisor shall assess the nature of substantive complaints and comments from members of the public and take them into consideration when analyzing and recommending options for resolution of the matters underlying those complaints and comments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 18.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

321.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission assess the consequences of its decisions, including economic effects, and assess and mitigate the impacts of its decision on customer, public, and employee safety, as part of each ratemaking, rulemaking, or other proceeding, and that this be accomplished using existing resources and within existing commission structures. The commission shall not establish a separate office or department for the purpose of evaluating
 and mitigating consequences of commission activities.

(b) The commission shall take all necessary and appropriate actions to assess the economic effects of its decisions and to assess and mitigate the impacts of its decisions on customer, public, and employee safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (SB 900)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

321.6.

The president of the commission shall annually appear before the appropriate policy committees of the Senate and Assembly to present the annual report of the commission required pursuant to Section 910.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 6.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

(a) The commission shall periodically, at least once each year, compile its rules of procedure together with every order and decision of the commission relating to the conduct of the commission’s hearings and proceedings.

(b) The compilation shall include, but not be limited to, matters relating to all of the following:

(1) Pleadings.

(2) Public
 notice.

(3) Public attendance.

(4) Specification of issues.

(5) Prehearing procedures.

(6) Discovery.

(7) Evidence.

(8) Supporting documentation.

(9) Submission of briefs and arguments.

(10) Meetings of the commission.

(11) All other rules of procedure governing participation in hearings and proceedings of the commission by public utilities, commission staff, and other persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

322.5.

The commission shall determine, as part of the proceeding in Rulemaking 98-07-038 (Rulemaking for purposes of Revising General Order 96-A Regarding Informal Filings at the Commission) or any other appropriate proceeding, as determined by the commission, the feasibility of submitting advice letters to the commission through electronic means. If determined to be feasible, the commission shall, within six months, propose a plan for submitting advice letters by electronic means. For purposes of this section, “electronic means” include electronic mail and electronic forms
 developed or approved by the commission and submitted through the commission’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 372, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

(a) Commencing January 1, 1989, the commission shall cause the complete text of each of its orders and decisions to be published within a reasonable time, not to exceed one year after issuance. The commission shall, on or before January 1, 1990, publish every significant decision or order issued, but not published, as of January 1, 1989.

(b) With respect to the order or decision in any proceeding not assigned to an administrative law judge pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 311, the commission may comply with subdivision (a) by publishing the
 docket number or other identifying number used in its recordkeeping system, the name of the case, the parties to the case, and the ordering language in the case.

(c) If the commission participates in or uses an electronic means of publication of its orders and decisions, the commission shall assure reasonable public access to that system upon the payment of reasonable fees or charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

323.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Demand-side energy management programs” mean all energy efficiency, demand-side response, clean distributed generation, energy conservation, energy savings, or weatherization programs of the state or a local government, electrical corporations, gas corporations, or a local publicly owned electric or gas utility.

(2) “Small business” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(b) The commission shall ensure that the Internet Web site for the Energy
 Upgrade California program is revised and
 maintained to include information related to demand-side energy management programs for small business customers.

(c) The commission, in consultation with the Office of Small Business Advocate within the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall ensure that adequate marketing, education, and outreach are undertaken that is directed at small business customers to enable small business customers to fully participate in ratepayer-funded demand-side energy management programs, including programs that provide financial incentives, rebates, technical assistance, and support pursuant to Sections 454.54 and 454.55.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   (AB 2831)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

The executive director of the commission may release to the Director of Industrial Relations any information concerning any person, corporation, or other entity under the jurisdiction and control of the commission relevant to the enforcement of the workers’ compensation laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1071, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

324.5.

(a) The Public Utilities Commission shall publish any data it collects for its clearinghouse minority and women business data base that it deems to be nonconfidential, including, but not limited to, company name, address, telephone number, fax number, point of contact, federal Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code, ethnicity code, gender code, and business description, for use by governmental agencies and the public who request the information. Publication of the data base shall be done on a semiannual basis and shall be made available
 in hardcopy and softcopy (computer disk). The data base shall also be made available electronically via a computer-accessed bulletin board service (BBS).

(b) The commission may impose fees on the requesters of information commensurate with its cost to publish, duplicate, or provide computer access to the data base.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1064, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

324.7.

No less frequently than once a year, the commission shall make the following information about each contract that the commission enters into available free of charge on its Internet Web site:

(a) The names, addresses, and points of contact of the parties to the contract.

(b) The goods and services requested, as applicable.

(c) The contract value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 815, Sec. 2.   (AB 1651)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

324.8.

The commission shall make available on its Internet Web site audits conducted by the Department of General Services of the commission’s contracting practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 815, Sec. 3.   (AB 1651)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the commission should have the authority to act swiftly to expedite planning for the long-term recovery in parts of the state which have been declared national disaster areas and in which severe damage to or destruction of existing utility facilities has occurred and to adopt expedited procedures for that purpose.

(b) The commission shall, therefore, review existing rules, regulations, and orders and develop and adopt new rules,
 regulations, or orders, as may be appropriate or necessary to establish expedited procedures to be followed in the event that a determination is made by the President of the United States that an emergency exists, of the severity and magnitude that effective response is beyond the capabilities of the state and the affected local governments and that federal assistance is necessary pursuant to Section 5191 of Title 42 of the United States Code Annotated. The procedures shall require a determination by the commission, upon application of a utility or other interested party, that the emergency has resulted in severe damage or destruction to an existing utility’s facilities or existing utilities’ facilities under the jurisdiction of the commission. The rules and regulations shall be developed consistent with existing rules and regulations pursuant to the authority granted to the commission in Sections 701 and 1701. The expedited procedures shall not prevent or otherwise interfere with a utility’s ability
 promptly to restore service to its customers requiring the service, and to recover the reasonable costs associated with the restoration of service, as determined by the commission. The expedited procedures shall be adopted by the commission on or before January 1, 1994.

(c) In developing the expedited procedures, the commission shall consider, among other things, the following:

(1) Once the President declares that an emergency exists, the extent to which the expedited procedures should become effective.

(2) The extent to which the expedited procedures should take precedence over any conflicting rule, regulation, or order which may impede any appropriate or necessary decisions and actions by the commission.

(3) If the expedited procedures become
 effective, the scope of relief which may be sought and granted pursuant thereto, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) A determination of the applicability of existing commission rules, regulations, and orders.

(B) An exemption from those existing rules and regulations.

(4) The time period following the date of the declaration of an emergency by the President, within which any affected city or county within the declared disaster area or public utility serving all or a portion of the county or city thereof, may apply to the commission for relief.

(5) The need, if any, for referral of any application to an administrative law judge, and the need, if any, for formal evidentiary hearings.

(d) No utility shall be required to proceed to incur any costs pursuant to commission order issued under these expedited procedures until arrangements satisfactory to the affected utility have been made for payment of the excess, if any, of the estimated costs of completing the work contemplated by the commission order over the amount of the costs allocated to the ratepayers by the commission order.

(e) The expedited procedures shall preserve the right of interested parties to reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard, as required by applicable law. The expedited procedures shall provide that in the event of an emergency as defined in this section, the commission has the authority to waive the referral of the application to an administrative law judge, and has the authority to act on the application.

(f) In the event that the President has declared that an
 emergency exists, pursuant to federal law, after January 1, 1993, and before the adoption of emergency procedures by the commission, the commission is authorized, and empowered to act expeditiously upon the direct request of any affected city or county or public utility serving all or a portion of the city or county, for relief; and to adopt expedited measures and procedures which the commission determines to be necessary or appropriate, including, but not limited to, the considerations set forth above in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

(a) By January 1, 2020, the commission shall establish the Wildfire Safety Division within the commission, located in Sacramento, California. The Wildfire Safety Division shall do all of the following:

(1) Oversee and enforce electrical corporations’ compliance with wildfire safety pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8385) of Division 4.1.

(2) In consultation with the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board, develop and recommend to the commission performance metrics to achieve maximum feasible risk reduction to be used to develop the wildfire mitigation plan and evaluate an electrical corporation’s
 compliance with that plan. For this purpose, “maximum feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, legal, social, and technological factors.

(3) Develop a field audit program for wildfire mitigation plan compliance by each electrical corporation.

(4) Consult with the Office of Emergency Services in the office’s management and response to utility public safety power shutoff events and utility actions for compliance with public safety power shutoff program rules and regulations.

(5) Support efforts to assess and analyze fire weather data and other atmospheric conditions that could lead to catastrophic wildfires
 and to reduce the likelihood and severity of wildfire incidents that could endanger the safety of persons, properties, and the environment within the state.

(6) Retain appropriate staff that includes experts in wildfire, weather, climate change, emergency response, and other relevant subject matters.

(7) Review, as necessary, in coordination with the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board and necessary commission staff, safety requirements for electrical transmission and distribution infrastructure and infrastructure and equipment attached to that electrical infrastructure, and provide recommendations to the commission to address the dynamic risk of climate change and to mitigate wildfire risk.

(b) Effective July 1,
 2021, all functions of the Wildfire Safety Division shall be transferred to the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety established pursuant to Section 15473 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (AB 111)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

326.1.

(a) There is hereby established the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board. The board shall advise the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety established pursuant to Section 15473 of the Government Code.

(b) The board shall consist of seven members. Five members shall be appointed by the Governor, one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The members of the board shall serve four-year staggered terms. The initial members of the board shall be appointed by January 1, 2020. The Governor shall designate three of the initial members who shall serve two-year terms. Members of the board shall be selected from industry experts, academics, and persons with labor and workforce safety experience or other relevant qualifications and shall represent a cross-section of relevant expertise including, at all times, at least three members experienced in the safe operation, design,
 and engineering of electrical infrastructure.

(c) The board shall meet at least quarterly and alternate meeting locations between northern, central, and southern California, when feasible.

(d) Members of the board who are not salaried state service employees shall be eligible for reasonable compensation, not to exceed a per diem of four hundred dollars ($400), for attendance at board meetings.

(e) All reasonable costs incurred by the board, including staffing, travel at state travel reimbursement rates, and administrative costs, shall be reimbursed through the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account provided for in Section 402 and shall be part of the budget of the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety. The office shall consult with the board in the preparation of this portion of the office’s proposed annual budget.

(f) Communications by the board, its staff, and individual members of the board are not subject to the commission’s ex parte rules set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1701) of Chapter 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 30.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

326.2.

The California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board shall do both of the following:

(a) Review and provide comments and advisory opinions to local publicly owned electric utilities and electrical cooperatives regarding the content and sufficiency of their wildfire mitigation plans and recommendations on how to mitigate wildfire risk.

(b) Provide other advice and recommendations related to wildfire safety as requested by the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 31.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

(a) The electrical corporations and gas corporations that participate in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program, as established pursuant to Section 739.1, shall administer low-income energy efficiency and rate assistance programs described in Sections 382, 739.1, 739.2, and 2790, subject to commission oversight. In administering the programs described in Section 2790, the electrical
 corporations and gas corporations, to the extent practicable, shall do all of the following:

(1) Continue to leverage funds collected to fund the program described in subdivision (a) with funds available from state and federal sources.

(2) Work with state and local agencies, community-based organizations, and other entities to ensure efficient and effective delivery of programs.

(3) Encourage local employment and job skill development.

(4) Maximize the participation of eligible participants.

(5) Work to reduce consumers electric and gas consumption, and bills.

(6) For electrical corporations, target energy efficiency and
 solar programs to upper-tier and multifamily customers in a manner that will result in long-term permanent reductions in electricity usage at the dwelling units, and develop programs that specifically target nonprofit affordable housing providers, including programs that promote weatherization of existing dwelling units and replacement of inefficient appliances.

(7) For electrical corporations and for public utilities that are both electrical corporations and gas corporations, allocate the costs of the CARE program on an equal cents per kilowatthour or equal cents per therm basis to all classes of customers that were subject to the surcharge that funded the program on January 1, 2008.

(b) If the commission requires low-income energy efficiency programs to be subject to competitive bidding, the electrical and gas corporations described in subdivision (a), as part of their bid
 evaluation criteria, shall consider both cost-of-service criteria and quality-of-service criteria. The bidding criteria, at a minimum, shall recognize all of the following factors:

(1) The bidder’s experience in delivering programs and services, including, but not limited to, weatherization, appliance repair and maintenance, energy education, outreach and enrollment services, and bill payment assistance programs to targeted communities.

(2) The bidder’s knowledge of the targeted communities.

(3) The bidder’s ability to reach targeted communities.

(4) The bidder’s ability to utilize and employ people from the local area.

(5) The bidder’s general contractor’s license and evidence of good
 standing with the Contractors’ State License Board.

(6) The bidder’s performance quality as verified by the funding source.

(7) The bidder’s financial stability.

(8) The bidder’s ability to provide local job training.

(9) Other attributes that benefit local communities.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the commission may modify the bid criteria based upon public input from a variety of sources, including representatives from low-income communities and the program administrators identified in subdivision (b), in order to ensure the effective and efficient delivery of high quality low-income energy efficiency programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 695)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. Natural Gas Restructuring [328. - 328.2.]

328.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) In order to ensure that all core customers of a gas corporation continue to receive safe basic gas service in a competitive market, each existing gas corporation should continue to provide this essential service.

(b) No customer should have to pay separate fees for utilizing services that protect public or customer safety.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 909, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

328.1.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Basic gas service” includes transmission, storage for reliability of service, and distribution of natural gas, purchasing natural gas on behalf of a customer, revenue cycle services, and after-meter services.

(b) “Revenue cycle services” means metering services, billing the customer, collection, and related customer services.

(c) “After-meter services” includes, but is not limited to, leak investigation, inspecting customer piping and appliances, carbon monoxide investigation, pilot relighting, and high bill investigation.

(d) “Metering services” includes, but is not limited to, gas meter installation, meter maintenance, meter testing, collecting and processing consumption data, and all related services associated with the meter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 909, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

328.2.

The commission shall require each gas corporation to provide bundled basic gas service to all core customers in its service territory unless the customer chooses or contracts to have natural gas purchased and supplied by another entity. A public utility gas corporation shall continue to be the exclusive provider of revenue cycle services to all customers in its service territory, except that an entity purchasing and supplying natural gas under the commission’s existing core aggregation program may perform billing and collection services for its customers under the same terms as currently authorized by the commission, and except that a supplier of natural gas to noncore customers may perform billing and collection for natural gas supply for its customers. The gas corporation shall continue to calculate its charges for services provided by that corporation. If the commission establishes credits to be provided by the gas corporation to core aggregation or noncore customers who obtain billing or collection services from entities other than the gas corporation, the credit shall be equal to the billing and collection services costs actually avoided by the gas corporation. The commission shall require the distribution rate to continue to include after-meter services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 909, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Electrical Restructuring [330. - 400.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [330. - 332.2.]

330.

In order to provide guidance in carrying out this chapter, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a cumulative rate reduction of at least 20 percent be achieved not later than April 1, 2002, for residential and small commercial customers, from the rates in effect on June 10, 1996. In determining that the April 1, 2002, rate reduction has been met, the commission shall exclude the costs of the competitively procured electricity and the costs associated with the rate reduction bonds, as defined in Section 840.

(b) The people, businesses, and institutions of California spend nearly twenty-three billion dollars ($23,000,000,000) annually on electricity, so that reductions in the price of electricity would significantly benefit the economy of the state and its residents.

(c) The Public Utilities Commission has opened rulemaking and investigation proceedings with regard to restructuring California’s electric power industry and reforming utility regulation.

(d) The commission has found, after an extensive public review process, that the interests of ratepayers and the state as a whole will be best served by moving from the regulatory framework existing on January 1, 1997, in which retail electricity service is provided principally by electrical corporations subject to an obligation to provide ultimate consumers in exclusive service territories with reliable electric service at regulated rates, to a framework under which competition would be allowed in the supply of electric power and customers would be allowed to have the right to choose their supplier of electric power.

(e) Competition in the electric generation market will encourage innovation, efficiency, and better service from all market participants, and will permit the reduction of costly regulatory oversight.

(f) The delivery of electricity over transmission and distribution systems is currently regulated, and will continue to be regulated to ensure system safety, reliability, environmental protection, and fair access for all market participants.

(g) Reliable electric service is of utmost importance to the safety, health, and welfare of the state’s citizenry and economy. It is the intent of the Legislature that electric industry restructuring should enhance the reliability of the interconnected regional transmission systems, and provide strong coordination and enforceable protocols for all users of the power grid.

(h) It is important that sufficient supplies of electric generation will be available to maintain the reliable service to the citizens and businesses of the state.

(i) Reliable electric service depends on conscientious inspection and maintenance of transmission and distribution systems. To continue and enhance the reliability of the delivery of electricity, the Independent System Operator and the commission, respectively, should set inspection, maintenance, repair, and replacement standards.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that California enter into a compact with western region states. That compact should require the publicly and investor-owned utilities located in those states, that sell energy to California retail customers, to adhere to enforceable standards and protocols to protect the reliability of the interconnected regional transmission and distribution systems.

(k) In order to achieve meaningful wholesale and retail competition in the electric generation market, it is essential to do all of the following:

(1) Separate monopoly utility transmission functions from competitive generation functions, through development of independent, third-party control of transmission access and pricing.

(2) Permit all customers to choose from among competing suppliers of electric power.

(3) Provide customers and suppliers with open, nondiscriminatory, and comparable access to transmission and distribution services.

(l) The commission has properly concluded that:

(1) This competition will best be introduced by the creation of an Independent System Operator and an independent Power Exchange.

(2) Generation of electricity should be open to competition.

(3) There is a need to ensure that no participant in these new market institutions has the ability to exercise significant market power so that operation of the new market institutions would be distorted.

(4) These new market institutions should commence simultaneously with the phase in of customer choice, and the public will be best served if these institutions and the nonbypassable transition cost recovery mechanism referred to in subdivisions (s) to (w), inclusive, are in place simultaneously and no later than January 1, 1998.

(m) It is the intention of the Legislature that California’s publicly owned electric utilities and investor-owned electric utilities should commit control of their transmission facilities to the Independent System Operator. These utilities should jointly advocate to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission a pricing methodology for the Independent System Operator that results in an equitable return on capital investment in transmission facilities for all Independent System Operator participants.

(n) Opportunities to acquire electric power in the competitive market must be available to California consumers as soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 1998, so that all customers can share in the benefits of competition.

(o) Under the existing regulatory framework, California’s electrical corporations were granted franchise rights to provide electricity to consumers in their service territories.

(p) Consistent with federal and state policies, California electrical corporations invested in power plants and entered into contractual obligations in order to provide reliable electrical service on a nondiscriminatory basis to all consumers within their service territories who requested service.

(q) The cost of these investments and contractual obligations are currently being recovered in electricity rates charged by electrical corporations to their consumers.

(r) Transmission and distribution of electric power remain essential services imbued with the public interest that are provided over facilities owned and maintained by the state’s electrical corporations.

(s) It is proper to allow electrical corporations an opportunity to continue to recover, over a reasonable transition period, those costs and categories of costs for generation-related assets and obligations, including costs associated with any subsequent renegotiation or buyout of existing generation-related contracts, that the commission, prior to December 20, 1995, had authorized for collection in rates and that may not be recoverable in market prices in a competitive generation market, and appropriate additions incurred after December 20, 1995, for capital additions to generating facilities existing as of December 20, 1995, that the commission determines are reasonable and should be recovered, provided that the costs are necessary to maintain those facilities through December 31, 2001. In determining the costs to be recovered, it is appropriate to net the negative value of above market assets against the positive value of below market assets.
